California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
The Consolidated Work Program Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, for the receipt of all moneys deposited pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. The Employment Development Department shall be the entity responsible for administering this section. Moneys in the fund shall be made available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department, for expenditure consistent with the purposes of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and the State Plan required by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 7.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions and Severability [14005. - 14007.]

14005.

For purposes of this division:

(a) “Board” means the California Workforce Development Board.

(b) “Agency” means the Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(c) “Career pathways,” “career ladders,” or “career lattices” are an identified series of positions, work experiences, or educational benchmarks or credentials with multiple access points that offer occupational and financial advancement within a specified career field or related fields over time. “Career pathways,” “career ladders,” and “career lattices” offer combined programs of rigorous and high-quality education, training, and other services that do all of the following:

(1) Align with the skill needs of industries in the economy of the state or regional economy involved.

(2) Prepare an individual to be successful in any of a full range of secondary or postsecondary education options, including apprenticeships registered under the National Apprenticeship Act of 1937 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 50 et seq.), except as in Section 3226 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(3) Include counseling to support an individual in achieving the individual’s education and career goals.

(4) Include, as appropriate, education offered concurrently with and in the same context as workforce preparation activities and training for a specific occupation or occupational cluster.

(5) Organize education, training, and other services to meet the particular needs of an individual in a manner that accelerates the educational and career advancement of the individual to the extent practicable.

(6) Enable an individual to attain a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, and at least one recognized postsecondary credential.

(7) Help an individual enter or advance within a specific occupation or occupational cluster.

(d) “Cluster-based sector strategies” mean methods of focusing workforce and economic development on those sectors that have demonstrated a capacity for economic growth and job creation in a particular geographic area.

(e) “Data driven” means a process of making decisions about investments and
 policies based on systematic analysis of data, which may include data pertaining to labor markets.

(f) “Economic security” means, with respect to a worker, earning a wage sufficient to support a family adequately, and, over time, to save for emergency expenses and adequate retirement income, based on factors such as household size, the cost of living in the worker’s community, and other factors that may vary by region.

(g) “Evidence-based” means making use of policy research as a basis for determining best policy practices. Evidence-based policymakers adopt policies that research has shown to produce positive outcomes, in a variety of settings, for a variety of populations over time. Successful, evidence-based programs deliver quantifiable and sustainable results. Evidence-based practices differ from approaches that are based on tradition, belief, convention, or anecdotal
 evidence.

(h) “High-priority occupations” mean occupations that have a significant presence in a targeted industry sector or industry cluster, are in demand, or projected to be in demand, by employers, and pay or lead to payment of a wage that provides economic security.

(i) (1) “In-demand industry sector or occupation” means either of the following:

(A) An industry sector that has a substantial current or potential impact, including through jobs that lead to economic self-sufficiency and opportunities for advancement, on the state, regional, or local economy, as appropriate, and that contributes to the growth or stability of other supporting businesses, or the growth of other industry sectors.

(B) An occupation that currently has
 or is projected to have a number of positions, including positions that lead to economic self-sufficiency and opportunities for advancement, in an industry sector so as to have a significant impact on the state, regional, or local economy, as appropriate.

(2) The determination of whether an industry sector or occupation is “in-demand” under this subdivision shall be made by the board or local board, or through the regional planning process in which local boards participate under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, as appropriate, using state and regional business and labor market projections, including the use of labor market information.

(j) “Individual with employment barriers” means an individual with any characteristic that substantially limits an individual’s ability to obtain employment, including indicators of poor work history, lack of work experience, or access
 to employment in nontraditional occupations, long-term unemployment, lack of educational or occupational skills attainment, dislocation from high-wage and high-benefit employment, low levels of literacy or English proficiency, disability status, or welfare dependency, including members of all of the following groups:

(1) Displaced homemakers.

(2) Low-income individuals.

(3) Indians, Alaska Natives, and Native Hawaiians, as those terms are defined in Section 3221 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(4) Individuals with disabilities, including youths who are individuals with disabilities.

(5) Older individuals.

(6) Ex-offenders.

(7) Homeless individuals, as defined in Section 14043e-2(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or homeless children and youths, as defined in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(8) Youth who are in, or have aged out of, the foster care system.

(9) Individuals who are English language learners, individuals who have low levels of literacy, and individuals facing substantial cultural barriers.

(10) Eligible migrant and seasonal farmworkers, as defined in Section 3322(i) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(11) Individuals within two years of exhausting lifetime eligibility under Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.).

(12) Single parents, including single, pregnant women.

(13) Long-term unemployed individuals.

(14) Transgender and gender nonconforming individuals.

(15) Any other groups as the Governor determines to have barriers to employment.

(k) “Industry cluster” means a geographic concentration or emerging concentration of interdependent industries with direct service, supplier, and research relationships, or independent industries that share common resources in a given regional economy or labor market. An industry cluster is a group of employers closely linked by common product or services, workforce needs, similar technologies, and supply chains in a given regional
 economy or labor market.

(l) “Industry or sector partnership” means a workforce collaborative, convened or acting in partnership with the board or a local board, that does the following:

(1) Organizes key stakeholders in an industry cluster into a working group that focuses on the shared goals and human resources needs of the industry cluster and that includes, at the appropriate stages of development of the partnership:

(A) Representatives of multiple businesses or other employers in the industry cluster, including small and medium-sized employers when practicable.

(B) One or more representatives of a recognized state labor organization or central labor council, or another labor representative, as appropriate.

(C) One or more representatives of an institution of higher education with, or another provider of, education or training programs that support the industry cluster.

(2) The workforce collaborative may include representatives of any of the following:

(A) State or local government.

(B) State or local economic development agencies.

(C) State boards or local boards, as appropriate.

(D) A state workforce agency or entity providing employment services.

(E) Other state or local agencies.

(F) Business or
 trade associations.

(G) Economic development organizations.

(H) Nonprofit organizations, community-based organizations, or intermediaries.

(I) Philanthropic associations.

(J) Industry associations.

(K) Other organizations, as determined to be necessary by the members comprising the industry sector or partnership.

(m) “Industry sector” means those firms that produce similar products or provide similar services using somewhat similar business processes, and are closely linked by workforce needs, within a regional labor market.

(n) “Local labor federation” means a
 central labor council that is an organization of local unions affiliated with the California Labor Federation or a local building and construction trades council affiliated with the State Building and Construction Trades Council of California.

(o) “Sector strategies” means methods of prioritizing investments in competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters on the basis of labor market and other economic data indicating strategic growth potential, especially with regard to jobs and income, and exhibit the following characteristics:

(1) Focus workforce investment in education and workforce training programs that are likely to lead to jobs providing economic security or to an entry-level job with a well-articulated career pathway into a job providing economic security.

(2) Effectively boost labor
 productivity or reduce business barriers to growth and expansion stemming from workforce supply problems, including skills gaps and occupational shortages by directing resources and making investments to plug skills gaps and provide education and training programs for high-priority occupations.

(3) May be implemented using articulated career pathways or lattices and a system of stackable credentials.

(4) May target underserved communities, disconnected youths, incumbent workers, and recently separated military veterans.

(5) Frequently are implemented using industry or sector partnerships.

(6) Typically are implemented at the regional level where sector firms, those employers described in subdivisions (j) and (l), often share a common labor market and
 supply chains. However, sector strategies may also be implemented at the state or local level depending on sector needs and labor market conditions.

(p) “Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014” means the federal act enacted as Public Law 113-128.

(q) (1) “Earn and learn” includes, but is not limited to, a program that does either of the following:

(A) Combines applied learning in a workplace setting with compensation allowing workers or students to gain work experience and secure a wage as they develop skills and competencies directly relevant to the occupation or career for which they are preparing.

(B) Brings together classroom instruction with on-the-job training to combine both formal instruction and actual paid work
 experience.

(2) “Earn and learn” programs include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Apprenticeships.

(B) Preapprenticeships.

(C) Incumbent worker training.

(D) Transitional jobs, as described in paragraph (5) of subsection (d) of Section 3174 of Title 29 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2021, and subsidized employment with an employer of record, which may include, but not be limited to, an employment social enterprise or a worker cooperative, particularly for individuals with barriers to employment.

(E) Paid internships and externships.

(F) Project-based compensated learning.

(r) “High road” means a set of economic and workforce development strategies to achieve economic growth, economic equity, shared prosperity and a clean environment. The strategies include, but are not limited to, interventions that:

(1) Improve job quality and job access, including for women and people from underserved and underrepresented populations.

(2) Meet the skill and profitability needs of employers.

(3) Meet the economic, social, and environmental needs of the community.

(s) “High road training partnership” means an initiative or project that models strategies for developing
 industry-based, worker-focused training partnerships, including labor-management partnerships. High Road Training partnerships operate via regional, industry- or sector-based training partnerships comprised of employers, workers, and their representatives including organized labor, community-based organizations, education, training, and social services providers, and labor market intermediaries. High Road Training partnerships demonstrate job quality standards and employment practices that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Provision of comparatively good wages and benefits, relative to the industry, occupation, and labor market in which participating workers are employed.

(2) Payment of workers at or above local or regional living wage standards as well as payment at or above regional prevailing wage standards where such standards exist for the occupations in
 question.

(3) A history of investment in employee training, growth, and development.

(4) Provision of opportunities for career advancement and wage growth.

(5) Safe and healthy working conditions.

(6) Consistent compliance with workplace laws and regulations, including proactive efforts to remedy past problems.

(7) Adoption of mechanisms to include worker voice and agency in the workplace.

(t) “High road construction careers” are high road training partnerships that invest in regional training partnerships comprised of local building trades councils, workforce, community, and education interests that connect to state-approved
 apprenticeship programs, that utilize the standard Multi-Craft Core preapprenticeship training curriculum and provide a range of supportive services and career placement assistance to women and people from underserved and underrepresented populations.

(u) “Career advancement” means demonstrated progression along a career ladder as evidenced by both wage growth and occupational advancement.

(v) “Employment social enterprise” means a nonprofit or for-profit organization that meets all of the following requirements: 

(1) Is organized as a social purpose corporation or a benefit corporation, or as an organization incorporated within a larger organization.

(2) Demonstrates evidence of a mission to
 provide and to access employment and social supports with on-the-job and life skills training to a direct labor force comprised of individuals with a “barrier to employment,” as that phrase is defined in Section 3102 of Title 29 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2021.

(3) Is evidence-based and utilizes data-driven policies in implementing procedures and measuring outcomes.

(4) Produces or assembles goods or provides services, or a combination of both.

(w) “Worker cooperative” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12253.5 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 223, Sec. 1.   (SB 779)   Effective January 1, 2022.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.

The provisions of this division are severable. If any provision of this division or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.

Each provision of this division shall remain in effect unless the United States Secretary of Labor determines that any provision of this division or its application is not in conformity with the requirements of federal law, at which time only those provisions of this division that are not in conformity with federal law shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. State Responsibilities [14010. - 14121.]



  ARTICLE 1. California Workforce Development Board [14010. - 14017.2.]

14010.

The California Workforce Development Board is the body responsible for assisting the Governor in the development, oversight, and continuous improvement of California’s workforce investment system and the alignment of the education and workforce investment systems to the needs of the 21st century economy and workforce.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 10.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.

The board shall report, through its executive director, to the Secretary of the Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14012.

The board shall be appointed by the Governor to assist in the development of the State Plan and to carry out other functions, as described in Section 14103. The board shall be comprised of the Governor and representatives from the following categories:

(a) Two members of each house of the Legislature, appointed by the appropriate presiding officer of each house.

(b) A majority of board members shall be representatives of business who:

(1) Are owners of businesses, chief executives or operating officers of businesses, and other business executives or employers with optimum
 policymaking or hiring authority, who, in addition, may be members of a local board described in Section 3122(b)(2)(A)(i) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(2) Represent businesses, including small businesses, or organizations representing businesses that include high-quality, work-relevant training and development in in-demand industry sectors or occupations in the state.

(3) Are appointed from a group of individuals nominated by state business organizations and business trade associations.

(c) (1) Not less than 20 percent of board members shall be representatives of the workforce within the state, including representatives of labor organizations nominated by state labor federations, who shall
 not be less than 15 percent of the board membership and who shall include at least one representative that is a member of a labor organization or a training director, from a joint labor-management apprenticeship program, or if no such joint program exists in the state, such a representative of an apprenticeship program in the state.

(2) Representatives appointed pursuant to this subdivision may include:

(A) Representatives of community-based organizations that have demonstrated experience and expertise in addressing the employment, training, or education needs of individuals with barriers to employment, including organizations that serve veterans, organizations that provide or support competitive, integrated employment for individuals with disabilities, organizations that
 serve transgender and gender nonconforming individuals, and organizations that represent or serve older adults.

(B) Representatives of organizations that have demonstrated experience and expertise in addressing the employment, training, or education needs of eligible youth, including representatives of organizations that serve out-of-school youth.

(d) The balance of board members:

(1) Shall include representatives of government that are lead state officials with primary responsibility for the core programs and shall include chief elected officials, collectively representing cities, counties, and cities and counties where appropriate.

(2) May include
 other representatives and officials as the Governor may designate, like any of the following:

(A) State agency officials from agencies that are one-stop partners, not specified in paragraph (1), including additional one-stop partners whose programs are covered by the State Plan, if any.

(B) State agency officials responsible for economic development or juvenile justice programs in the state.

(C) Individuals who represent an Indian tribe or tribal organization, as those terms are defined in Section 3221(b) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(D) State agency officials responsible for education programs in the state, including chief executive officers, or
 their designees, of institutions of higher education, including, but not limited to, the California Community College system, the California State University system, the University of California system, and their respective individual campuses.

(E) State agency officials responsible for administering programs that serve, and state commission officials that advocate on behalf of, older adults or their designees.

(e) Other requirements of board membership shall include:

(1) The Governor shall select a chairperson for the board from among the representatives described in subdivision (b).

(2) The members of the board shall represent diverse geographic areas of the
 state, including urban, rural, and suburban areas.

(f) For purposes of this section, “older adults” means persons 60 years of age or older.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 332, Sec. 2.   (AB 2207)   Effective January 1, 2025.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14013.

The board shall assist the Governor in the following:

(a) Promoting the development of a well-educated and highly skilled 21st century workforce, and the development of a high road economy that offers an educated and skilled workforce with fair compensation and treatment in the workplace.

(b) Developing, implementing, and modifying the State Plan. The State Plan shall serve as the comprehensive framework and coordinated plan for the aligned investment of all federal and state workforce training and employment services funding streams and programs. To the extent feasible and when appropriate, the State Plan should reinforce and work with adult education and career technical education efforts that are responsive to labor
 market trends, as well as economic trends that impact the labor market and workforce, including, but not limited to, climate change, automation of work, and employment.

(c) The review and technical assistance of statewide policies, of statewide programs, and of recommendations on actions that should be taken by the state to align workforce, education, training, and employment funding programs in the state in a manner that supports a comprehensive, high-quality, and streamlined workforce development system in the state, including the review and provision of comments on the State Plan, if any, for programs and activities of one-stop partners that are not core programs.

(d) Developing and continuously improving the statewide workforce investment system, including:

(1) The identification of barriers and means for
 removing barriers to better coordinate, align, and avoid duplication among the programs and activities carried out through the system.

(2) The development, promotion, and implementation of strategies, as well as the administration of, an field assistance for, programs to advance the use of career pathways for the purpose of providing individuals, including low-skilled adults, youth, and individuals with barriers to employment, and including individuals with disabilities, with workforce investment activities, education, and supportive services to enter or retain high-quality employment. To the extent permissible under state and federal laws, these policies and strategies should support linkages between kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and community college educational systems in order to help secure educational and career advancement. These policies and strategies may be implemented using a sector strategies framework and should
 ultimately lead to placement in a job providing economic security or job placement in an entry-level job that has a well-articulated career pathway or career ladder to a job providing economic security.

(3) The development, promotion, and implementation of strategies for providing effective outreach to and improved access for individuals and employers who could benefit from services provided through the workforce development system.

(4) The development, promotion, and implementation of strategies, as well as the administration of, and field assistance for, programs that meet the needs of employers, workers, and jobseekers, particularly through industry or sector partnerships related to in-demand industry sectors and occupations, including policies targeting resources to competitive and emerging industry sectors and industry clusters that provide economic security and are either
 high-growth sectors or critical to California’s economy, or both. These industry sectors and clusters shall have significant economic impacts on the state and its regional and workforce development needs, including, but not limited to, California’s transition to a carbon neutral economy, and have documented career opportunities.

(5) Consistent with the definitions in Section 14005, developing standards, procedures, and criteria for defining high road employers, high road jobs, high road workforce development, and high road training partnerships in California, in accordance with lessons learned from the board’s ongoing high road workforce development initiatives.

(6) The administration, promotion, and expansions of, as well as field assistance for, high road training partnerships, as defined in Section 14005.

(7) The
 administration, promotion, and expansion of, as well as field assistance for, high road construction careers, as defined in Section 14005.

(8) Recommending adult and dislocated worker training policies and investments that offer a variety of career opportunities while upgrading the skills of California’s workforce. These may include training policies and investments pertaining to any of the following:

(A) Occupational skills training, including training for nontraditional employment.

(B) On-the-job training.

(C) Incumbent worker training in accordance with Section 3174(d)(4) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(D) Programs that combine workplace training with related instruction, which
 may include cooperative education programs.

(E) Training programs operated by the private sector.

(F) Skill upgrading and retraining.

(G) Entrepreneurial training.

(H) Transitional jobs in accordance with Section 3174(d)(5) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(I) Job readiness training provided in combination with any of the services described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive.

(J) Adult education and literacy activities provided in combination with any of the services described in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(K) Customized training conducted
 with a commitment by an employer or group of employers to employ an individual upon successful completion of the training.

(e) The identification of regions, including planning regions, for the purposes of Section 3121(a) of Title 29 of the United States Code, and the designation of local areas under Section 3121 of Title 29 of the United States Code, after consultation with local boards and chief elected officials.

(f) The development and continuous improvement of the one-stop delivery system in local areas, including providing assistance to local boards, one-stop operators, one-stop partners, and providers with planning and delivering services, including training services and supportive services, to support effective delivery of services to workers, job seekers, and employers.

(g) Recommending strategies to the
 Governor for strategic training investments of the Governor’s 15-percent discretionary funds.

(h) Developing strategies to support staff training and awareness across programs supported under the workforce development system.

(i) The development and updating of comprehensive state performance accountability measures, including state-adjusted levels of performance, to assess the effectiveness of the core programs in the state as required under Section 3141(b) of Title 29 of the United States Code. As part of this process the board shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop a workforce metrics dashboard, to be updated annually, that measures the state’s human capital investments in workforce development to better understand the collective impact of these investments on the labor market. The board shall determine the
 approach for measuring labor market impacts, provided that, to the extent feasible, the board uses statistically rigorous methodologies to estimate, assess, and isolate the impact of programs on participant outcomes. The workforce metrics dashboard shall be produced, to the extent feasible, using existing available data and resources that are currently collected and accessible to state agencies. The board shall convene workforce program partners to develop a standardized set of inputs and outputs for the workforce metrics dashboard. The workforce metrics dashboard shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide a status report on credential attainment, training completion, degree attainment, and participant earnings from workforce education and training programs. The board shall publish and distribute the final report.

(B) Provide demographic breakdowns, including, to the extent
 possible, race, ethnicity, age, gender, veteran status, wage and credential or degree outcomes, and information on workforce outcomes in different industry sectors.

(C) Measure, at a minimum and to the extent feasible with existing resources, the performance of the following workforce programs: community college career technical education, the Employment Training Panel, Title I and Title II of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220), Title I and Title II of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-128), Trade Adjustment Assistance, and state apprenticeship programs.

(D) Measure participant earnings in California, and to the extent feasible, in other states. The Employment Development Department shall assist the board by calculating aggregated participant earnings using unemployment insurance wage records, without
 violating any applicable confidentiality requirements.

(2) The State Department of Education is hereby authorized to collect the social security numbers of adults participating in adult education programs so that accurate participation in those programs can be represented in the workforce metrics dashboard. However, an individual shall not be denied program participation if the individual refuses to provide a social security number. The State Department of Education shall keep this information confidential, except, the State Department of Education is authorized to share this information, unless prohibited by federal law, with the Employment Development Department, the board, or the board’s designee, who shall keep the information confidential and use it only to track the labor market and other outcomes described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of program participants in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and mandates,
 including all performance reporting requirements under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(3) (A) Participating workforce programs, including, but not limited to, those specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), shall provide participant data in a standardized format to the Employment Development Department, the board, or the board’s designee.

(B) The Employment Development Department, the board, or the board’s designee, shall aggregate data provided by participating workforce programs and shall report the data, organized by demographics, earnings, and industry of employment, to the board to assist the board in producing the annual workforce metrics dashboard.

(4) The board shall ensure that a designee has the technical and operational capability of meeting appropriate privacy
 and security requirements.

(j) The identification and dissemination of information on best practices, including best practices for all of the following:

(1) The effective operation of one-stop centers, relating to the use of business outreach, partnerships, and service delivery strategies, including strategies for serving individuals with barriers to employment.

(2) The development of effective local boards, which may include information on factors that contribute to enabling local boards to exceed negotiated local levels of performance, sustain fiscal integrity, and achieve other measures of effectiveness.

(3) Effective training programs that respond to real-time labor market analysis, that effectively use direct assessment and prior learning
 assessment to measure an individual’s prior knowledge, skills, competencies, and experiences, and that evaluate such skills, and competencies for adaptability, to support efficient placement into employment or career pathways.

(k) The development and review of statewide policies affecting the coordinated provision of services through the state’s one-stop delivery system described in Section 3151(e) of Title 29 of the United States Code, including the development of all of the following:

(1) Objective criteria and procedures for use by local boards in assessing the effectiveness and continuous improvement of one-stop centers described in Section 3151(e) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(2) Guidance for the allocation of one-stop center infrastructure funds under Section 3151(h) of Title 29 of the United States
 Code.

(3) Policies relating to the appropriate roles and contributions of entities carrying out one-stop partner programs within the one-stop delivery system, including approaches to facilitating equitable and efficient cost allocation in such a system.

(l) The development of strategies for technological improvements to facilitate access to, and improve the quality of, services and activities provided through the one-stop delivery system, including such improvements to all of the following:

(1) Enhance digital literacy skills, as defined in Section 9101 of Title 20 of the United States Code, referred to in this division as “digital literacy skills.”

(2) Accelerate the acquisition of skills and recognized postsecondary credentials by participants.

(3) Strengthen the professional development of providers and workforce professionals.

(4) Ensure the technology is accessible to individuals with disabilities and individuals residing in remote areas.

(m) The development of strategies for aligning technology and data systems across one-stop partner programs to enhance service delivery and improve efficiencies in reporting on performance accountability measures, including the design and implementation of common intake, data collection, case management information, and performance accountability measurement and reporting processes and the incorporation of local input into such design and implementation, to improve coordination of services across one-stop partner programs.

(n) The development of allocation
 formulas for the distribution of funds for employment and training activities for adults, and youth workforce investment activities, to local areas as permitted under Sections 3163(b)(3) and 3173(b)(3) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(o) The preparation of the annual reports described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of Section 3141(d) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(p) The development of the statewide workforce and labor market information system described in Section 49l–2(e) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(q) By July 1, 2020, the development, in conjunction with the Employment Development Department and with input from local workforce development boards, of a policy regarding mutual aid agreements between and among local workforce development boards to enable them to effectively respond to disasters
 and that is consistent with applicable state and federal law.

(r) The development of other policies as may promote statewide objectives for, and enhance the performance of, the workforce development system in the state.

(s) Helping individuals with barriers to employment, including low-skill, low-wage workers, the long-term unemployed, and members of single-parent households, achieve economic security and upward mobility by implementing policies that encourage the attainment of marketable skills relevant to current labor market trends.

(t) (1) Evaluating program outcomes, including program participant outcomes for all grant programs administered by the California Workforce Development
 Board, regardless of funding source.

(2) The California Workforce Development Board shall produce and submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, evaluating its grant programs by October 1 of every odd-numbered year. The evaluation report shall include both quantitative and qualitative analyses of any grant programs established on or after July 1, 2025, for which the board administers funding, as well as the following existing programs:

(A) High road workforce programs, as described in Section 14014.

(B) The Breaking Barriers to Employment Initiative, as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 14030).

(C) The Prison
 to Employment program, as specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14040).

(D) Preapprenticeship training programs utilized by public agencies receiving funding from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, as described in Section 2038 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 22.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14014.

(a) Consistent with the intent of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14000, the California Workforce Development Board shall collect and report program and outcome data for its high road workforce programs.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply:

(1) The Employment Development Department shall make available to the board any and all wage and employment data necessary to evaluate all relevant high road programs and grants.

(2) All grant applicants and program beneficiaries participating in a
 high road training partnership program shall provide any and all necessary information to the state to facilitate public transparency, accountability, and grant and program performance evaluation, including any relevant data needed to determine the outcomes and benefits of programing and grants funded for program participants, high road training partnerships, industry, and the workforce system.
